Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.070

Danger of infection—Emergencies.

When any local governing body notifies the director of the presence or probable danger of infection from any animal diseases, the director, state veterinarian, or a deputized state veterinarian shall respond immediately and take appropriate action. In case of an emergency, the director may appoint deputies or assistants with equal power to act.

[ 1998 c 8 s 7; 1947 c 172 s 6; 1927 c 165 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3116. Prior: 1895 c 167 s 4.]